src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-k12x_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  Noun - : # k_
    skúgvur+N+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: skúgvur
    skúgvur+N+Msc+Sg+Acc+Indef: skúgv
    skúgvur+N+Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef: skúgvi
    skúgvur+N+Msc+Sg+Gen+Indef: skúvs
    skúgvur+N+Msc+Pl+Nom+Indef: skúgvar
    skúgvur+N+Msc+Pl+Acc+Indef: skúgvar
    skúgvur+N+Msc+Pl+Dat+Indef: skúgvum
    skúgvur+N+Msc+Pl+Gen+Indef: skúgva
    skúgvur+N+Msc+Sg+Nom+Def: skúgvurin
    skúgvur+N+Msc+Sg+Acc+Def: skúgvin
    skúgvur+N+Msc+Sg+Dat+Def: skúgvinum
    skúgvur+N+Msc+Sg+Gen+Def: skúvsins
    skúgvur+N+Msc+Pl+Nom+Def: skúgvarnir
    skúgvur+N+Msc+Pl+Acc+Def: skúgvarnar
    skúgvur+N+Msc+Pl+Dat+Def: skúgvunum
    skúgvur+N+Msc+Pl+Gen+Def: skúgvanna
